Missouri, session 2026, SB1315.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 167.2025, to read as
follows:
167.2025. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Parent", a child's parent, legal guardian, or
other person standing in loco parentis for a child;
(2) "Presenting", offering in person or via any means
of communication provided, maintained, supervised, hosted,
monitored, or otherwise controlled by the school;
(3) "Protection of Pupil Rights Amendment" or "PPRA",
the federal Protection of Pupil Rights Amendment, as set
forth in 20 U.S.C. Section 1232h, as amended;
(4) "School", any institution of elementary or
secondary education that is subject to the PPRA and receives
state funding. The term shall be construed to include
charter schools;
(5) "Survey", any method or tool used to gather
information from students, including, but not limited to,

SB 1315 2
any survey, questionnaire, quiz, analysis, evaluation, or
other class activity.
2. At least twenty-four hours prior to presenting a
survey to a student, a school shall notify the parent of
such student, disclose the full contents of the survey to
such parent, and obtain written parental consent if the
survey asks any question relating to any of the following
items protected under the federal Protection of Pupil Rights
Amendment:
(1) Political affiliations or beliefs of the student
or the student's parent;
(2) Mental or psychological problems of the student or
the student's family, including, but not limited to,
substance abuse issues;
(3) Sexual behavior or attitudes;
(4) Illegal, antisocial, self-incriminating, or
demeaning behavior;
(5) Critical appraisals of other individuals with whom
the student has close family relationships;
(6) Legally recognized privileged or analogous
relationships, such as those of lawyers, physicians, and
ministers;
(7) Religious practices, affiliations, or beliefs of
the student or the student's parent; or
(8) Income, except as required by law to determine
eligibility for participation in a program or for receiving
financial assistance under such program.
3. The information required to be disclosed to parents
pursuant to subsection 2 of this section may be posted on
the school's website on a page that is easily accessible to
parents, provided that notification of such posting is

SB 1315 3
provided to parents by individual communication through the
school's ordinary parent information system.
4. The attorney general or the prosecuting or circuit
attorney in the county in which a violation of this section
occurs may bring a civil action, including an action for
injunctive relief, against any school district or charter
school, as well as any school board member, charter school
governing body member, or other school district, public
school, or charter school officer or employee, including
counselors, teachers, principals, contracted personnel, or
other paid or unpaid agents or officials of the school, for
any intentional or grossly negligent act or omission that
constitutes a violation of this section, or for negligent
supervision of an individual leading to a violation of this
section. Such action shall be brought in the county where
the violation occurred. If the court finds the defendant's
act or omission constitutes gross negligence by a
preponderance of the evidence, the court shall impose a fine
of five hundred dollars per violation. If the court finds
the defendant's negligent supervision or act or omission
constitutes an intentional violation of this section by a
preponderance of the evidence, the court shall impose a fine
of two thousand dollars per violation.
5. Any parent or guardian may bring a civil action
against any school district or charter school, as well as
any school board member, charter school governing body
member, or other school district, public school, or charter
school officer or employee, including counselors, teachers,
principals, contracted personnel, or other paid or unpaid
agents or officials of the school in which such parent or
guardian's child is enrolled, for any intentional or grossly
negligent act or omission that constitutes a violation of

SB 1315 4
this section that affects such parent or guardian's child,
or for negligent supervision of an individual leading to a
violation of this section that affects such parent or
guardian's child. Such action shall be brought in the
county where the violation occurred. If the parent or
guardian prevails in establishing that the defendant's act
or omission constitutes gross negligence by a preponderance
of the evidence, the court shall award to the parent or
guardian five hundred dollars per violation plus court costs
and reasonable attorney's fees. If the parent or guardian
prevails in establishing the defendant's negligent
supervision or that the defendant's act or omission
constitutes an intentional violation by a preponderance of
the evidence, the court shall award to the parent or
guardian two thousand dollars per violation plus court costs
and reasonable attorney's fees.
✓